Washington statutes.
RCW 43.330.020

Department created.

A department of commerce is created. The department shall be vested with all powers and duties established or transferred to it under this chapter and such other powers and duties as may be authorized by law. Unless otherwise specifically provided, the existing responsibilities and functions of the agency programs will continue to be administered in accordance with their implementing legislation.

[ 2009 c 565 s 3; 1993 c 280 s 4.]